Hawaii statutes.
[§229-2] Hawaii sister-state committee.
There shall be established the Hawaii sister-state committee, to be placed
within the department of business, economic development, and tourism for
administrative purposes only, consisting of five members appointed by the
governor as provided in section 26-34.

The purpose of the committee shall be to advise
the governor and the legislature on matters relating to sister-state or
province relations and relations, in general, between the State and the states
or provinces of foreign countries. The governor shall appoint five members,
one member from each of five lists of nominees submitted respectively by the
following:

(1) Speaker of the house of representatives;

(2) President of the senate;

(3) Native Hawaiian cultural organization;

(4) East-West Center; and

(5) Hawaii State Association of Counties.

A chair and vice chair of the committee shall
be appointed by the committee members from among themselves. Members shall
serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including
travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. [L 2006, c 150,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next